Utah statutes.
63M-7-504.   Crime Victim Reparations and Assistance Board -- Members.

(1) (a)  A Crime Victim Reparations and Assistance Board is created, consisting of seven members appointed by the governor with the consent of the Senate.

(b)  The membership of the board shall consist of:

(i)  a member of the bar of this state;

(ii)  a victim of criminally injurious conduct;

(iii)  a licensed physician;

(iv)  a representative of law enforcement;

(v)  a mental health care provider;

(vi)  a victim advocate; and

(vii)  a private citizen.

(c)  The governor may appoint a chair of the board who shall serve for a period of time prescribed by the governor, not to exceed the length of the chair's term.  The board may elect a vice chair to serve in the absence of the chair.

(d)  The board may hear appeals from administrative decisions as provided in rules adopted pursuant to Section 63M-7-515.

(2) (a)  Except as required by Subsection (2)(b), as terms of current board members expire, the governor shall appoint each new member or reappointed member to a four-year term.

(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (2)(a), the governor shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms to ensure that the terms of board members are staggered so that approximately half of the board is appointed every two years.

(c)  A member may be reappointed to one successive term in addition to a member's initial full-term appointment.

(3) (a)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement shall be appointed for the unexpired term.

(b)  A member resigning from the board shall serve until the member's successor is appointed and qualified.

(4)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

(5)  The board shall meet at least once quarterly but may meet more frequently as necessary.



Amended by Chapter 131, 2011 General Session

